Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.4791

Secure community transition facility—Proceeding concerning public safety measures.

A petition brought pursuant to RCW 71.09.342(5) shall be heard under the provisions of RCW 34.05.479 except that the decision of the governor's designee shall be final and is not subject to judicial review.

[ 2002 c 68 s 10.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Severability—Effective date—2002 c 68: See notes following RCW 36.70A.200.